Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1358
State highway system; funds; source; assistance by political subdivisions.

Funds for the construction of the state highway system shall be derived from such state revenue as may be provided by law. Any governmental or political subdivision or public corporation of this state may, if it has funds available, assist with such funds in the construction of any part of a highway in such governmental or political subdivision or public corporation, and when such funds are used, bids shall be received and contracts awarded as provided in sections 39-1348 and 39-1349; Provided, that county road dragging funds shall not be used for this purpose.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 58, p. 442;

Laws 1959, c. 167, § 3, p. 610.